Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1048
Attachment; order of discharge; appeal; original action unaffected.

The original action shall proceed to trial and judgment in every other respect as though no writ of error has been prosecuted.

G.S.1873, c. 57, § 2, p. 715;

R.S.1913, § 7777;

C.S.1922, § 8721;

C.S.1929, § 20-1048;

R.S.1943, § 25-1048.

Proper dissolution of an attachment issued on a contractual obligation not yet due terminates action. McCartney v. McCartney, 128 Neb. 671, 260 N.W. 184 (1935).

Justice may proceed with original action though error proceedings taken on attachment. Rhodes v. Samuels, 67 Neb. 1, 93 N.W. 148 (1903).